West Virginia, session 2025, HB2624.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY. §61-3-13. Grand and Petit, grand and aggravated grand larceny distinguished; penalties. (a) If a person commits simple larceny of goods or chattels of the value of $1000 $2,500 or more, such person is guilty of a felony, designated grand larceny, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in the penitentiary not less than one nor more than ten years or, in the discretion of the court, be confined in jail not more than one year and shall be and, in the discretion of the court, fined not more than $2500 $10,000.(b) If a person commits simple larceny of goods or chattels of the value of less than $1,000 $2,500, such person is guilty of a misdemeanor, designated petit larceny, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in jail for a term not to exceed one year or fined not to exceed $2,500, or both, in the discretion of the court.(c) If a person commits simple larceny of goods or chattels of the value of $25,000 or more, such person is guilty of a felony, designated aggravated grand larceny, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in the penitentiary not less than three years nor more than 15 years, and, in the discretion of the court, fined not more than $100,000.